Missouri, session 2026, SB1663.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 620.580, 620.582, 620.584, 620.586,
620.588, 620.590, and 620.592, RSMo, are repealed and seven new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
173.4000, 173.4002, 173.4004, 173.4006, 173.4008, 173.4010, and
173.4012, to read as follows:
[620.580.] 173.4000. Sections [620.580] 173.4000 to
[620.592] 173.4012 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Community Service Act".
[620.582.] 173.4002. As used in sections [620.580]
173.4000 to [620.592] 173.4012, the following terms mean:
(1) "Act", the national and community service act of
1990, as amended;
(2) "Commission", the Missouri community service
commission created by sections [620.580] 173.4000 to
[620.592] 173.4012;
(3) "Community service programs", the performance of
tasks designed primarily to address educational, public
safety, human, or environmental needs at a local, regional,
state, or multistate level;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1663 2
(4) "Corporation", the corporation for national and
community service authorized by the act;
(5) "National service laws", the act and other federal
legislation that authorizes or may authorize community
service activities in states;
(6) "National service position", a placement in a
community service program whereby an individual may earn an
educational award, as authorized by the act.
[620.584.] 173.4004. 1. The Missouri community
service commission is assigned to the department of
[economic development] higher education and workforce
development.
2. The commission is established to make community
service the common expectation and experience of all
Missourians with a special concentration on Missouri's young
people. The commission shall focus its efforts primarily on
issues related to education, public safety, human needs, and
the environment.
3. The commission shall work to renew the ethic of
civic responsibility in Missouri and to involve and enroll
citizens in service opportunities that benefit Missouri
while offering citizens skills that can be used to further
their own plans for education, for a career, or for
continuing community services. The commission shall build
on the existing organizational framework of state, local,
and community-based programs and agencies to expand full-
time and part-time service opportunities for all citizens,
but particularly Missouri's youth.
[620.586.] 173.4006. 1. The commission shall include
at least fifteen, but no more than nineteen, voting members
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the

SB 1663 3
senate. The commission shall include the following voting
members:
(1) A representative of local government;
(2) The commissioner of the department of elementary
and secondary education or the designee of such person;
(3) An individual with experience in promoting the
involvement of older adults in service and volunteerism;
(4) A representative of a national service program;
(5) An individual with expertise in the educational,
training, and development needs of youth, particularly
disadvantaged youth;
(6) An individual between the ages of sixteen and
twenty-five years who is a participant in or supervisor of a
service program for school-age youth, or a campus-based or
national service program;
(7) A representative of community-based agencies or
organizations in the state;
(8) A representative of labor organizations;
(9) A member representing the business community;
(10) The lieutenant governor or his or her designee;
(11) A representative of the volunteer sector; and
(12) Between four and eight other members, appointed
by the governor, provided that no more than twenty percent
of the voting members are officers or employees of the
state, and provided further that not more than fifty percent
plus one of the voting members of the commission are members
of the same political party.
2. The commission shall include at least one
nonvoting, ex officio member who shall be a representative
from the corporation for national and community service.
The governor may appoint any number of other nonvoting, ex

SB 1663 4
officio members who shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor.
3. Appointments to the commission shall reflect the
race, ethnicity, age, gender, and disability characteristics
of the population of the state as a whole.
4. Voting members shall serve renewable terms of three
years, except that of the first members appointed, one-third
shall serve for a term of one year, one-third shall serve
for a term of two years, and one-third shall serve for a
term of three years. If a commission vacancy occurs, the
governor shall appoint a new member to serve for the
remainder of the unexpired term. Vacancies shall not affect
the power of the remaining members to execute the
commission's duties.
5. The members of the commission shall receive no
compensation for their services on the commission, but shall
be reimbursed for ordinary and necessary expenses incurred
in the performance of their duties.
6. The voting members of the commission shall elect
one of their members to serve as chairperson of the
commission. The voting members may elect such other
officers as deemed necessary.
7. The commission shall meet at least quarterly.
[620.588.] 173.4008. 1. The commission shall have the
following powers and duties:
(1) To ensure that its funding decisions meet all
federal and state statutory requirements;
(2) To prepare for this state an annual national
service plan that follows state and federal guidelines;
(3) To recommend innovative statewide service programs
to increase volunteer participation and community-based

SB 1663 5
problem solving by all age groups and among diverse
participants;
(4) To utilize local, state, and federal resources to
initiate, strengthen, and expand quality service programs;
(5) To promote interagency collaboration to maximize
resources and develop a model of such collaboration on the
state level;
(6) To oversee the application process to apply for
corporation grants and funds, and for approval of service
positions;
(7) To establish priorities, policies, and procedures
for the use of funds received under national service laws
and for funds deposited into the community service
commission fund established in section [620.592] 173.4012;
(8) To provide technical assistance for applicants to
plan and implement service programs and to apply for
assistance under the national service laws;
(9) To solicit and accept gifts, contributions,
grants, bequests, or other aid from any person, business,
organization or foundation, public or private, and from
federal, state or local government or any agency of federal,
state or local government.
2. The commission shall have other powers and duties
in addition to those listed in subsection 1 of this section,
including:
(1) To utilize staff within the department of
[economic development] higher education and workforce
development, the office of a designated statewide elected
official, or other executive departments as needed for this
purpose; and

SB 1663 6
(2) To enter into contracts with individuals,
organizations, and institutions within amounts available for
this purpose.
[620.590.] 173.4010. 1. All state agencies, the
University of Missouri extension system, and any unit of
local government, including school districts, may share
information and cooperate with the commission to enable it
to perform the functions assigned to it by state and federal
law.
2. Any state agency that operates or plans to
establish a community service program may coordinate its
efforts with the commission.
[620.592.] 173.4012. 1. There is hereby created in
the state treasury the "Community Service Commission Fund".
The state treasurer shall deposit to the credit of the fund
all moneys which may be appropriated to it by the general
assembly and also any gifts, contributions, grants,
bequests, or other aid received from federal, private, or
other sources. The general assembly may appropriate moneys
into the fund for the support of the commission and its
activities. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the fund shall not revert
to the credit of the general revenue fund at the end of the
biennium.
2. The commission shall submit an annual report of its
activities to the speaker of the house of representatives,
the president pro tem of the senate, and the governor before
January thirty-first of each year.
✓